Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 37.2-700.
Construction of state facilities; razing buildings.

The Commissioner, subject to the approval of the Board and the Governor, shall determine the necessity for and select the site of any new state facility and any land to be taken or purchased by the Commonwealth for the purposes of any new or existing state facility. The Commissioner shall have charge of the construction of any new building at any state facility, shall determine the design of the building, and may employ architects and other experts or hold competitions for plans and designs for this purpose. If any land or property is taken or purchased by the Board, title shall be taken in the name of the Commonwealth.

If any building standing on property under the supervision and control of the Department is in such a state of dilapidation or disrepair that it is, in the opinion of the Commissioner, dangerous to individuals receiving services, employees of the Department, or other persons frequenting that property, the Commissioner may, with the approval of the Board and the Governor, cause the building to be torn down or razed. For this purpose, the Commissioner may contract with any person on the terms that he deems expedient and may sell or otherwise dispose of the materials composing the building.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 37-34.1, 37-34.2; 1950, p. 901; 1952, c. 480; 1968, c. 477, §§ 37.1-11, 37.1-12; 1980, c. 582; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals receiving services” for “consumers” in the first sentence of subsection B.

Law Review.

For article on state constitutions and the environment, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1972).

§ 37.2-701.
Examination of properties; certain property not to be declared surplus.

The Commissioner is hereby authorized to examine the condition of the state facilities operated by the Department based upon the practices and methods employed by the Department in the care and treatment of individuals admitted to any state facility. No property that is being used for the care and treatment of individuals receiving services or that is reasonably related to the present or future needs of the Department for care and treatment of individuals receiving services shall be declared surplus.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-34.2:2; 1958, c. 556; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-13; 1976, c. 671; 1978, c. 770; 1980, c. 582; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals” for “persons” in the first sentence and “individual receiving services” for “consumers” and “individuals receiving services” for “consumers” in the second sentence.

§ 37.2-702.
Separate state facilities for elderly individuals; free-standing state facilities authorized.

The Department shall establish and operate a separate geriatric unit within each state facility that serves significant numbers of elderly individuals. Each unit shall provide care and treatment for those individuals and shall be separated in a reasonable manner from the rest of the state facility.

The Board may, giving full consideration to the needs and resources available, authorize the establishment of free-standing state facilities for elderly individuals receiving services.

History.

1974, c. 402, § 37.1-24.2; 1980, c. 582; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals” for “persons” in the second sentence of the first paragraph and “elderly individuals receiving services” for “geriatric consumers” at the end of the second paragraph.

§ 37.2-703.
Commissioner to prescribe system of records, accounts, and reports; access to records, accounts, and reports.

The Commissioner shall prescribe and cause to be established and maintained at all state facilities:

A uniform, proper, and approved system of keeping the records and accounts and making reports of money received and disbursed; and

An efficient system of keeping records concerning the individuals admitted to or receiving services in each state facility.The Board, the Commissioner, and their duly authorized agents shall at all times have access to such records, accounts, and reports required to be kept under the provisions of this title.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 37-45, 37-46; 1950, p. 902; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-27; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 1984, c. 734; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “the individuals admitted to or receiving services in” for “the consumers admitted to or residing in” in subdivision (b).

§ 37.2-704.
Commissioner authorized to receive and expend social security and other federal payments for individuals receiving services in state facilities.

The Commissioner, under any provision of federal law and regulation and with the approval of the Governor, may be appointed or function as the agent to whom payments may be made on behalf of any beneficiary in state facilities. These payments shall be expended for the use and benefit of the individuals receiving services to whom they would otherwise be payable, and any residue resulting from such payments shall be set aside in a special fund to the credit of the individual on whose account the payment is made. The charges provided for by law for the care of the individual receiving services shall be defrayed from such payments. The provisions of subsection C of §

37.2-705

shall apply to any payments received under this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-48.1; 1954, c. 412; 1958, c. 446; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-28; 1980, c. 582; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals receiving services” for “consumers” and “individual” for “consumer” in the second sentence, and “individual receiving services” for “consumer” in the third sentence.

§ 37.2-705.
Private funds provided for individuals receiving services.

The Commissioner is hereby authorized to provide for the deposit with the director or other proper officer of any state facility of any money given or provided for the purpose of supplying extra comforts, conveniences, or services to any individual in a state facility and any money otherwise received and held from, for, or on behalf of any individual in a state facility.

All funds so provided or received shall be deposited to the credit of the state facility in a special fund in a bank or banks designated by the Commissioner and shall be disbursed as may be required by the respective donors or, in the absence of such requirement, as directed by the director.

The director of each state facility shall furnish to the Commissioner annually a statement showing the amounts of funds received and deposited, the amounts expended, and the amounts remaining in such special funds at the end of the year. The Commissioner shall have authority to invest so much of the remaining funds as he may deem proper in United States government bonds or other securities authorized by law for the investment of fiduciary funds. The interest from these investments may be expended as a part of a welfare fund at each state facility.

If any individual receiving services for whose benefit any such fund has been or shall be provided has departed or shall depart from any state facility, leaving any unexpended balance in such fund, and the director, in the exercise of reasonable diligence, has been or shall be unable to find the person or persons entitled to such unexpended balance, the Commissioner may, after the lapse of three years from the date of such departure, authorize the use of the balance for the benefit of all or any of the individuals then in the state facility.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 37-47 to 37-50; 1950, p. 902; 1968, c. 477, §§ 37.1-29 to 37.1-32; 1972, c. 639; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individual” for “consumer” near the middle, and “individual in a state facility” for “consumer” at the end, of subsection A; and substituted “If any individual receiving services for whose” for “If any consumer for whose” at the beginning, and “individuals” for “consumers” near the end, of subsection D.

§ 37.2-706.
Disposal of unclaimed personal property of certain individuals in state facilities.

If any individual receiving services in a state facility dies, is released, is discharged, or escapes and leaves any article of personal property, including bonds, money, and any intangible assets, in the custody of a state facility, the director of the state facility may, after notification in person, by telephone, or by registered mail to the individual, or the known next-of-kin or personal representative of the individual and after the lapse of three years from the date of the death, release, discharge, or escape, if no claim has been made:

Sell the personal property at public or private sale and deposit the net proceeds in the welfare fund of the state facility;

Retain and issue for use of individuals receiving services articles of clothing suitable for continued use; or

Order destruction or other disposal of personal care articles, articles of clothing, and other belongings that are not suitable by reason of their nature or condition for sale or use by others, including personal and private papers, writings, drawings, or photographs that would compromise the privacy or confidentiality of any person who may be the author, creator, or subject of them.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-230.1; 1960, c. 387; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-33; 1972, c. 639; 1976, c. 671; 1996, cc. 196, 853; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “If any individual receiving services in a state facility” for “If any consumer in a state facility” at the beginning, and “to the individual, or the known next-of-kin or personal representative of the individual and after” for “to the consumer, known next-of-kin, or personal representative of the consumer and after” near the middle, in the introductory paragraph; and substituted “individuals receiving services” for “current consumers” in subdivision 2.

§ 37.2-707.
Employment and qualifications of directors of state facilities.

The Commissioner shall employ a director for each state facility who shall be skilled in facility management and administration and who shall meet requirements that may be determined by the Commissioner. However, the director need not be a physician.

Any director of a state facility employed or reemployed by the Commissioner after July 1, 2002, may be employed as a classified employee or under a contract that specifies the terms and conditions of employment, including compensation, benefits, duties and responsibilities, performance standards, evaluation criteria, and contract termination and renewal provisions. The length of employment contracts shall be two years, with provisions for annual renewals thereafter based on the performance of the incumbent. Any director of a state facility employed by the Commissioner before July 1, 1999, may elect to continue his current employment status subject to the provisions of the Virginia Personnel Act, Chapter 29 (§

2.2-2900

et seq.) of Title 2.2, or he may choose to be employed under a contract. Any director of a state facility employed under an employment contract shall be exempt from the Virginia Personnel Act, yet he shall remain subject to the provisions of the State Grievance Procedure (§

2.2-3000

et seq.). Personnel actions under this exemption shall be taken without regard to race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, color, national origin, religion, age, disability, or political affiliation.

Each director shall be responsible to the Commissioner or his designee for the safe, efficient, and effective operation of his state facility. Each director shall take any actions consistent with law necessary to ensure that his facility complies with all applicable federal and state statutes, regulations, policies, and agreements. The Commissioner shall evaluate the performance of each director of a state facility at least annually.

Whenever any act required by law to be performed by a director employed hereunder constitutes the practice of medicine, as defined in §

54.1-2900

, and the director is not a licensed physician, the act shall be performed by a licensed physician designated by the director.

History.

1978, c. 213, § 37.1-42.2; 1980, c. 582; 1999, c. 576; 2000, cc. 565, 610; 2002, cc. 271, 572; 2005, c. 716; 2020, c. 1137.

Cross references.

As to the exemption of certain officers and employees from the Virginia Personnel Act, see §

2.2-2905

.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1137, inserted “sexual orientation, gender identity” in the last sentence of the second paragraph.

§ 37.2-708.
Salaries of directors and other employees of state facilities.

The directors and other employees of state facilities shall each annually receive such salaries as shall be fixed from time to time in the appropriation act, and, when they occupy buildings on the grounds or belonging to their state facility, they shall pay the rent that was fixed in accordance with law.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-22; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-16; 1972, c. 639; 1998, c. 872, § 37.1-42.3; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-709.
State facility reporting requirements.

Each director of a state facility shall notify the Director of the Commonwealth’s designated protection and advocacy system, established pursuant to §

51.5-39.13

, in writing within 48 hours of critical incidents or deaths of individuals receiving services in the state facility.

History.

1978, c. 213, § 37.1-42.2; 1980, c. 582; 1999, c. 576; 2000, cc. 565, 610; 2002, cc. 271, 572; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507, 847; 2013, c. 571.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, c. 847, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, c. 571, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §§

2.2-510

,

37.2-304

, and

37.2-709

of the Code of Virginia shall be effective on January 1, 2014.”

Acts 2012, c. 847, cl. 4 provides: “That the Director of the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy shall, together with the Secretary of Health and Human Resources or his designee, develop a plan for implementation of the provisions of this act and shall report on such plan to the Governor and the General Assembly no later than December 1, 2013.”

Acts 2012, c. 847, cl. 5 provides: “That any regulations adopted by the Board for Protection and Advocacy being abolished by the first enactment of this act that are in effect before January 1, 2014, are hereby repealed as of that date. The Registrar of Regulations shall take appropriate administrative action to effect the repeal of the regulations in the Virginia Administrative Code.”

Acts 2013, c. 571, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §§

2.2-2905

,

2.2-3705.3

,

37.2-304

, and

37.2-709

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective January 1, 2014.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals receiving services” for “consumers.”

The 2012 amendment by c. 847, effective January 1, 2014, substituted “established pursuant to §

51.5-39.13

” for “pursuant to § 51.5-39.12.” For effective date, see Editor’s note.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 571, effective January 1, 2014, substituted “Commonwealth’s designated protection and advocacy system” for “Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy.”

§ 37.2-709.1.
State facility reporting requirements; critical incidents involving individuals receiving services.

In each case in which an individual receiving services in a state hospital or state training center is involved in a critical incident, the director of the state facility, or his designee, shall notify the individual’s authorized representative or person identified pursuant to subdivision A 11 of §

37.2-400

regarding the critical incident, any injury to the individual resulting from the critical incident, and any actions taken to address the factors leading to the critical incident and injuries to the individual resulting from the critical incident.

To the extent authorized by federal law, notice to an individual’s authorized representative or person identified pursuant to subdivision A 11 of §

37.2-400

shall be made by telephone within 24 hours of the critical incident unless the individual’s authorized representative or person identified pursuant to subdivision A 11 of §

37.2-400

has requested an alternate means or timeframe for notification. However, if the director, or his designee, is unable to contact the individual’s authorized representative or person identified pursuant to subdivision A 11 of §

37.2-400

by telephone within 24 hours of the critical incident, or as otherwise requested, the director, or his designee, shall notify the individual’s authorized representative or person identified pursuant to subdivision A 11 of §

37.2-400

of the critical incident, any injury to the individual resulting from the critical incident, and any actions taken to address the factors leading to the critical incident and injuries to the individual resulting from the critical incident, in writing by registered mail to the last known address of the individual’s authorized representative or person identified pursuant to subdivision A 11 of § 37.2-400.

In cases in which the director of a state facility, or his designee, is unable to identify an individual’s authorized representative or person identified pursuant to subdivision A 11 of §

37.2-400

or to obtain the telephone number or last known address of such person despite all reasonable efforts to do so, the provisions of this section shall not apply.

For the purposes of this section, “critical incident” shall be defined as serious bodily injury or loss of consciousness requiring medical treatment.

History.

2012, c. 138.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the references to “consumer” within this section have been changed to “individual.” Acts 2012, cc. 476 and 507, replaced the definition of “Consumer” with “Individual receiving services” or “Individual” in the definitions for this title as set out in §

37.2-100

.

§ 37.2-710.
State facility reporting requirements; Virginia Patient Level Data system.

State facilities shall report such data about each individual receiving services and financial data as may be required to the Virginia Patient Level Data system in accordance with Chapter 7.2 (§

32.1-276.2

et seq.) of Title 32.1.

History.

1985, c. 87, § 37.1-98.2; 1999, c. 764; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “data about each individual receiving services” for “patient-level data.”

§ 37.2-711.
Exchange of information.

The Department and state facilities may exchange specific information about individuals who are receiving or who have received services with community services boards or behavioral health authorities to monitor the delivery, outcome, and effectiveness of services; however, no publicly available report or information produced or generated by them shall reveal the identity of any individual who is receiving or who has received services. Publicly available information shall be designed to prevent persons from being able to gain access to combinations of characteristic data elements about individuals who are receiving or who have received services that reasonably could be expected to reveal the identity of any individual. In order to collect unduplicated information, the Department, subject to all regulations adopted by the Board or by agencies of the United States government that govern confidentiality of information about individuals who are receiving or who have received services, may require that the individuals disclose or furnish their social security numbers.

History.

1985, c. 87, § 37.1-98.2; 1999, c. 764; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and rewrote the section.

§ 37.2-712.
Collection and dissemination of information concerning religious preferences and affiliations.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any state facility may collect and disseminate information concerning the religious preferences and affiliations of individuals receiving services, provided that no individual may be required to indicate his religious preference or affiliation and that no dissemination of the information shall be made except to categories of persons as to whom the individual or his guardian or other legally authorized representative or other fiduciary has given his authorization that dissemination may be made.

No authorization given pursuant to this section shall be construed to allow any state facility to disseminate to federal government authorities information concerning the religious preferences and affiliations of individuals receiving services for the purpose of compiling a list, registry, or database of individuals based on religious affiliation, national origin, or ethnicity, unless such dissemination is specifically required by state or federal law.

History.

1977, c. 506, § 37.1-84.1:1; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2019, c. 774.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals receiving services” for “its consumers” once and “individual” for “consumer” twice.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 774 inserted the subsection A designation and added subsection B.

§ 37.2-713.
Residence of individuals in state facilities and school-age children in state facilities generally.

For purposes of eligibility for and receipt of social services and public assistance, each individual receiving services in a state facility shall be deemed a resident of the county or city in which he resided at the time of his admission to the state facility, and not of the county or city in which the state facility is located. The Department shall be entitled to receive annually from the Board of Education and the school division where the individual resided at the time of his admission a sum equal to the required local expenditure per pupil, as set forth in the appropriation act, and an additional payment for special education, as applicable, for support of the individual’s education. This amount shall be paid by the Board of Education, and the Board shall then deduct that payment from the amount payable by the Board of Education from the basic school aid fund to the school division.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 37-95, 37-191; 1950, p. 912; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-96; 1974, c. 366; 1975, c. 568; 1976, c. 680; 1986, c. 154; 1987, c. 413; 2005, c. 716; 2010, cc. 386, 629; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, cc. 386 and 629, cl. 4 provides: “That the estimate of population provided by the Weldon Cooper Center for Public Service at the University of Virginia be used as the basis for apportionment and distribution of sales tax revenues to public school divisions beginning July 1, 2012.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 386 and 629 are identical, and deleted the second sentence, which read: “Each person between the ages of two and 21 in the population of any state facility whom the Department determines could benefit from a program of education or training shall be included in the census taken as provided in § 22.1-281” and substituted “resided at the time of his admission” for “is included in the census.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individual receiving services” for “consumer,” “individual” for “person,” and “individual’s” for “person’s” throughout the section.

§ 37.2-714.
Children born in state facilities.

Any child born in a state facility shall be deemed a resident of the county or city in which the mother resided at the time of her admission. The child shall be removed from the state facility as soon after birth as the health and well-being of the child permit and shall be delivered to his other parent or other member of his family. If he is unable to effect the child’s removal as herein provided, the director of the state facility shall cause the filing of a petition in the juvenile and domestic relations district court of the county or city in which the child is present, requesting adjudication of the care and custody of the child under the provisions of § 16.1-278.3. If the mother has received services in a state facility continuously for 10 months, the Department of Social Services shall have financial responsibility for the care of the child, and the custody of the child shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of § 16.1-278.3. The judge of such court shall take appropriate action to effect prompt removal of the child from the state facility.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-96; 1950, p. 912; 1958, c. 386; 1964, c. 299; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-97; 1972, c. 639; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 1991, c. 534; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2020, c. 900.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “If the mother has received services” for “If the mother has been a consumer” at the beginning of the fourth sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 900, substituted “other parent” for “father” in the second sentence.

§ 37.2-714.1.
State facilities; video visitation.

The director of every state facility shall establish a process to facilitate virtual visitation through the use of audio and video equipment for individuals receiving services at the state facility.

History.

2022, c. 295.